Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5893.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-37-13.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-37 entitled "Sexual
Assault" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-37-13.3. Sexual assault reports.
(a) A law enforcement officer who responds to or investigates a sexual assault or child
molestation sexual assault incident, shall, upon determination of probable cause for arrest or referral
to the attorney general’s office, complete a sexual assault report (DV/SA-1) domestic
violence/sexual assault reporting form.
(b) For the purpose of establishing accurate data on the extent and severity of arrests for
sexual assault incidents and child molestation sexual assault in the state and on the degree of
compliance with the requirements of this section the domestic violence training and monitoring
unit of the court system within the administrative office of state courts shall prescribe a form and
process for making submitting sexual assault reports and/or child molestation sexual assault
information to the unit. The form shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:
(1) Name of the parties;
(2) Relationship of the parties;
(3) Sex of the parties;
(4) Date of birth of the parties;
(5) Time and date of the alleged incident;
(6) Whether children were allegedly involved or whether the alleged act of sexual assault

or child molestation sexual assault was committed in the presence of children;
(7) Type and extent of the alleged abuse;
(8) Number and types of alleged weapons involved;
(9) Existence of any prior court order; and
(10) Existence of any language barriers; and
(10)(11) Any other data that may be necessary for a complete analysis of all circumstances
leading to the arrest of an incident subject to reporting under this section.
(c) Each police law enforcement department shall forward copies of the reports to the unit
at the end of each month electronically submit the domestic violence/sexual assault reporting forms
and the corresponding police report narratives to the unit at the end of each month. For those cases
that were still under investigation or for which an arrest warrant had been issued but not yet
executed in a given month, the responsible law enforcement department shall electronically submit
the domestic violence/sexual assault reporting form and the corresponding police report narratives
as soon as practicable, but no later than the end of the calendar year in which the incident occurred.
(d) Upon adjudication of acquittal, dismissal or other exoneration, the domestic
violence/sexual assault report reporting form will be expunged by the domestic violence training
and monitoring unit.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001482
========
LC001482 - Page 2 of 3